New Jersey, session 222, A4586.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.2008, c.126 (C.52:14-17.29n) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a.  The State Health Benefits Commission shall, on or after the effective date of this act, provide benefits for medically necessary expenses incurred in the purchase of a hearing aid or cochlear implant for a covered person [21 years of age or younger], as provided in this section. b.    The benefits shall include the purchase of a hearing aid for each ear, when medically necessary and as prescribed or recommended by a licensed physician or audiologist.  The commission may limit the benefit provided in this section to $2,500 per hearing aid for each hearing-impaired ear every 60 months. c.     The benefits shall provide coverage of the cost of treatment related to cochlear implants, including procedures for the implantation of cochlear devices and costs for any parts, attachments, or accessories of the device, including replacement of obsolete external cochlear implant processors. (cf: P.L.2023, c.275, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.